Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska44-6014
Total adjusted capital, defined.

Total adjusted capital means the sum of:

(1) An insurer's or a health organization's statutory capital and surplus as determined in accordance with the statutory accounting applicable to the annual financial statements required to be filed under sections 44-322, 44-32,134, 44-3823, and 44-4720; and

(2) Such other items, if any, as the risk-based capital instructions may provide.

Laws 1993, LB 583, § 26;

Laws 1999, LB 258, § 19.